tests/commonwords.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../ain.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ain.automorf.hfst
Tests:
  Most Common Words:
    ネ<unk>: ネ
    カ<unk>: カ
    アン<unk>: アン
    タ<unk>: タ
    ワ<unk>: ワ
    コ<unk>: コ
    イ<unk>: イ
    ヒ<unk>: ヒ
    ピ<unk>: ピ
    ルウェ<unk>: ルウェ
    パ<unk>: パ
    ㇺ<unk>: ㇺ
    ㇷ<unk>: ㇷ
    ウタ<unk>: ウタ
    セコ<unk>: セコ
    ハウェアン<unk>: ハウェアン
    キ<unk>: キ
    クニ<unk>: クニ
    ニ<unk>: ニ
    ヤㇰ<unk>: ヤㇰ
